Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin YMCA OF THE NORTH; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $4,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to YMCA of the North to design, construct, furnish, and equip a Child and Family Wellbeing Center of Excellence to be located in the Hamline-Midway neighborhood of St. Paul. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end